Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1983 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and to make other minor word changes.
Minor word changes were also made in
AS 17.20 in 1981 and in the whole title in 1998, 2010, and 2018.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska food code, see 18 AAC 31.